District of Columbia statutes.
10-1334

Establishment of Board of Directors.

(a)

A Board of Directors (“Board”) is established to meet the objectives of the Foundation and to administer the Fund.

(b)

The Board shall be composed of residents of the District of Columbia who are collectively representative of the geographical, ethnic, economic, and social diversity of the District of Columbia. Advisory committees and subcommittees that may be established by the Foundation may be composed of residents and nonresidents of the District.

(c)

The Board shall be composed of the following members:

(1)

One member appointed by each member of the Council, with the chairperson of the Board appointed by the Chairman of the Council;

(2)

The Secretary to the Council;

(3)

The Archivist of the District of Columbia;

(4)

A representative of the Historical Society of Washington, D.C.;

(5)

A representative of the D.C. Preservation League;

(6)

A representative of the National Trust for Historic Preservation;

(7)

A representative designated by the Mayor of the District of Columbia; and

(8)

A representative designated by the John A. Wilson family.

(d)

The Board shall:

(1)

Have the power to adopt, amend, or repeal by-laws for operation of the Foundation;

(2)

Meet not less than quarterly at times to be determined;

(3)

Prepare and submit to the Council quarterly reports on the progress on the Foundation’s fundraising;

(4)

Be authorized to hire staff; and

(5)

Be authorized to exercise all powers conferred upon a nonprofit corporation pursuant to Chapters 1, 2, and 4 of Title 29.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-180, § 5, 43 DCR 4246
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(d), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 9-734.
D.C. Law 18-378, in subsec. (d)(5), substituted “Chapters 1, 2, and 4 of Title 29” for “Chapter 3 of Title 29”.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1331.